Colorado, session 2026A, SB048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-2-106, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion, (1)(a)(I), and (1)(b) as follows:
14-2-106. License to marry.
(1) (a) When a marriage license application has been completed
and signed by both parties to a prospective marriage and at least one party
has appeared, or both parties appeared if permitted pursuant to section
14-2-106.5, before the county clerk and recorder, and A PARTY has paid
the marriage license fee of seven dollars, a fee of twenty dollars to be
transmitted by the county clerk and recorder to the state treasurer and
credited by the treasurer to the Colorado domestic abuse program fund
created in section 39-22-802 (1), and an additional amount established
pursuant to section 25-2-121 such amount to be credited to the vital
statistics records cash fund, pursuant to section 25-2-121, the county clerk
shall issue a license to marry and a marriage certificate form upon being
furnished:
(I) Satisfactory proof that each party to the marriage will have
attained the age of eighteen years at the time the marriage license
becomes effective; or, if over the age of sixteen years but has not attained
the age of eighteen years, has judicial approval, as provided in section
14-2-108; and
(b) Violation of subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section makes the
marriage voidable VOID.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-1-111, repeal
(2)(d) as follows:
-2- 048

19-1-111. Appointment of guardian ad litem.
(2) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem in the following
cases:
(d) For an underage party seeking a marriage license, as provided
in section 14-2-108 (2).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 14-2-108.
SECTION 4. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this act,
the general fund appropriation made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the judicial department for use by
the office of the child's representative for court-appointed counsel is
decreased by $7,125.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of
an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
judicial department for use by the office of the child's representative for
court-appointed counsel is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include a general fund appropriation to the judicial
department for use by the office of the child's representative for
court-appointed counsel.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
-3- 048

general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to marriage licenses issued on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-4- 048